test/src/morphology/N-coggalm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - cõõggâlm e-stem tuki: # Noun - full paradigm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Nom: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Gen: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Acc: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Ill: cõglma
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Loc: cõglmest
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Com: cõglmin
     cõõggâlm+N+Ess: cõglmen
     cõõggâlm+N+Par: cõglmed
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Abe: cõõggâlmtää
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Nom: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Gen: cõglmi
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Acc: cõglmid
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Ill: cõglmid
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Loc: cõglmin
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Com: cõglmivuiˊm
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Abe: cõglmitää
